aghul.lexd
PATTERNS
teenprefix[ц1а-teen] numeralsbelowten[ц1а-teen]
teenprefix[ц1е-teen] numeralsbelowten[ц1е-teen]
aboveten[comp] vigasimalsuffix[comp]
numeralsbelowten[short]vigasimalsuffix[short]
numeralsbelowten[comp]vigasimalsuffix[comp]
hundredthousand

LEXICON numeralsbelowten
са<num>:сa[ц1а-teen]				#1
гIу<num>:гIу[ц1а-teen]				#2
хьибу<num>:хьибу[ц1е-teen][short][comp]		#3
гйакьу<num>:гйакьу[ц1е-teen][short][comp]	#4
гIифу<num>:гIифу[ц1а-teen]	#5
герхьи<num>:герхьи[ц1е-teen]	#6
гери<num>:гери[ц1е-teen]	#7
муйа<num>:муйа[ц1а-teen]	#8
гйарчва<num>:гйарчва[ц1е-teen]	#9

LEXICON teenprefix
гицIу<num>:цIа[ц1а-teen]
гицIу<num>:цIе[ц1е-teen]

LEXICON aboveten
гицIу<num>:гицIu		#10
къа<num>:къа[comp]		#20
гйагъцIур<num>:гйагъцIур[comp]	#40

LEXICON vigasimalsuffix
къа<num>:къа[short]
къа=на=гицIу<num>:къаннагицIу[comp] 

LEXICON hundredthousand
гIерш<num>:гIерш		#100
аIзур<num>:аIзур		#1000
